Massachusetts, session 194th, H3002.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Group 2 of paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, as most recently amended by section 107 of chapter 194 of the acts of 1998, is
hereby further amended by striking out the words University of Massachusetts police.
SECTION 2. Group 4 of said paragraph (g) of said subdivision (2) of said section 3 of
said chapter 32, as appearing in the 1996 official edition, is hereby amended by inserting after
the words correctional facilities in line 336 the following words:- Police officers of the university
of Massachusetts.
of 1